Florida, session 2026, SB240.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2) through (33) and (34) 30 through (48) of section 403.703, Florida Statutes, are 31 redesignated as subsections (3) through (34) and (36) through 32 (50), respectively, new subsections (2) and (35) are added to 33 that section, and present subsection (35) of that section is 34 amended, to read: 35 403.703âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 36 (2)ââAuxiliary containerâ means a bag, cup, bottle, can, or 37 other packaging that meets both of the following requirements: 38 (a)âIs made of cloth; paper; plastic, including, but not 39 limited to, foamed plastic, expanded plastic, or polystyrene; 40 cardboard and other corrugated material; molded fiber; aluminum; 41 glass; postconsumer recycled material; or similar material or 42 substrates, including coated, laminated, or multilayer 43 substrates. 44 (b)âIs designed for transporting, consuming, or protecting 45 merchandise, food, or beverages from or at a public food service 46 establishment as defined in s. 509.013(5), a food establishment 47 as defined in s. 500.03, or a retailer as defined in s. 48 212.02(13). 49 (35)ââSingle-useâ means designed to be used once and then 50 discarded and not designed for repeated use and sanitizing. 51 (37)(35)ââSolid wasteâ means sludge unregulated under the 52 federal Clean Water Act or Clean Air Act, sludge from a waste 53 treatment works, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution 54 control facility, or garbage, rubbish, refuse, special waste, or 55 other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or 56 contained gaseous material resulting from domestic, industrial, 57 commercial, mining, agricultural, or governmental operations. 58 Recovered materials as defined in subsection (29) subsection 59 (28) and post-use polymers as defined in subsection (25) 60 subsection (24) are not solid waste. 61 Section 2.âSection 403.7033, Florida Statutes, is amended 62 to read: 63 403.7033âRegulation of auxiliary containers Departmental 64 analysis of particular recyclable materials.âThe Legislature 65 finds that prudent regulation of recyclable materials is crucial 66 to the ongoing welfare of Floridaâs ecology and economy. As 67 such, the Department of Environmental Protection shall review 68 and update its 2010 report on retail bags analyzing the need for 69 new or different regulation of auxiliary containers, wrappings, 70 or disposable plastic bags used by consumers to carry products 71 from retail establishments. The updated report must include 72 input from state and local government agencies, stakeholders, 73 private businesses, and citizens and must evaluate the efficacy 74 and necessity of both statewide and local regulation of these 75 materials. To ensure consistent and effective implementation, 76 the department shall submit the updated report with conclusions 77 and recommendations to the Legislature no later than December 78 31, 2021. Until such time that the Legislature adopts the 79 recommendations of the department, 80 (1)âPREEMPTION OF THE REGULATION OF AUXILIARY CONTAINERS.âA 81 local government or, local governmental agency, or state 82 governmental agency may not enact any rule, regulation, or 83 ordinance regarding the use, disposition, sale, prohibition, 84 restriction, or tax of such auxiliary containers which is 85 inconsistent with this section, wrappings, or disposable plastic 86 bags. This subsection does not apply to rules, regulations, or 87 ordinances that do any of the following: 88 (a)âRestrict the use of glass auxiliary containers within 89 the boundaries of any public property. 90 (b)âRestrict the use, sale, or distribution of auxiliary 91 containers enacted before January 1, 2026. 92 (c)âRestrict the use, sale, or distribution of single-use 93 plastic auxiliary containers within the boundaries of any public 94 property. 95 (2)âCREATION OF A UNIFORM ORDINANCE FOR AUXILIARY 96 CONTAINERS.âThe department shall develop a uniform ordinance for 97 the use and disposal of single-use, nonrecyclable auxiliary 98 containers which may be adopted and enforced by local 99 governments. 100 (a)âIn developing the uniform ordinance, the department 101 shall collaborate with a broad range of stakeholders, including 102 local governments, environmental groups, businesses, and other 103 interested parties, to encourage cooperation and consensus 104 building. 105 (b)âIn developing the uniform ordinance, the department 106 shall hold at least three public workshops with such 107 stakeholders described in paragraph (a). The department shall 108 allow public participation in person and through communications 109 media technology. The department shall hold workshops in 110 different regions of this state to maximize public 111 participation. 112 (c)âIn developing the uniform ordinance, the department 113 shall advance measures in furtherance of the following: 114 1.âLimiting the distribution and use of single-use, 115 nonrecyclable auxiliary containers through bans, fees, or 116 deposit systems. 117 2.âPromoting the use of recyclable or compostable auxiliary 118 containers and encouraging businesses to offer voluntary 119 incentives for customers to bring reusable auxiliary containers. 120 3.âEstablishing waste reduction and collection programs for 121 single-use auxiliary containers. 122 4.âCreating enforcement mechanisms, including penalties, 123 for businesses that do not comply with auxiliary container 124 regulations. 125 (d)âThe department shall begin engaging with stakeholders 126 through workshops and solicitation no later than October 1, 127 2026, and finalize the uniform ordinance by October 1, 2027. 128 (3)âSINGLE-USE AUXILIARY CONTAINERS ON STATE LAND.âWithin 129 any lands managed by the Division of Recreation and Parks of the 130 Department of Environmental Protection: 131 (a)âThe sale or distribution of single-use plastic 132 auxiliary containers must be eliminated to the greatest extent 133 possible. 134 (b)âThe use, sale, or distribution of single-use auxiliary 135 containers that contain polystyrene foam is prohibited. 136 (4)âSTATEWIDE MARINE DEBRIS REDUCTION PLAN.âBy December 31, 137 2026, the department shall develop and make available on its 138 website a statewide Marine Debris Reduction Plan. At a minimum, 139 the plan must include all of the following: 140 (a)âRecommendations for data collection and reporting 141 protocols. 142 (b)âIdentification of key infrastructure or policy gaps 143 regarding persistent litter into marine and coastal 144 environments. 145 (c)âStrategies for reducing the generation and discharge of 146 plastics, polystyrene, and other persistent litter into marine 147 and coastal environments. 148 (d)âA proposed funding and implementation framework. 149 (e)âRecommendations for a competitive grant program to 150 provide financial assistance to local governments and nonprofits 151 to reduce marine debris. 152 Section 3.âSection 500.90, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 153 Section 4.âParagraph (j) of subsection (9) of section 154 403.707, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 155 403.707âPermits.â 156 (9)âThe department shall establish a separate category for 157 solid waste management facilities that accept only construction 158 and demolition debris for disposal or recycling. The department 159 shall establish a reasonable schedule for existing facilities to 160 comply with this section to avoid undue hardship to such 161 facilities. However, a permitted solid waste disposal unit that 162 receives a significant amount of waste prior to the compliance 163 deadline established in this schedule shall not be required to 164 be retrofitted with liners or leachate control systems. 165 (j)âThe Legislature recognizes that recycling, waste 166 reduction, and resource recovery are important aspects of an 167 integrated solid waste management program and as such are 168 necessary to protect the public health and the environment. If 169 necessary to promote such an integrated program, the county may 170 determine, after providing notice and an opportunity for a 171 hearing prior to April 30, 2008, that some or all of the 172 material described in s. 403.703(7)(b) s. 403.703(6)(b) shall be 173 excluded from the definition of âconstruction and demolition 174 debrisâ in s. 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) within the jurisdiction 175 of such county. The county may make such a determination only if 176 it finds that, prior to June 1, 2007, the county has established 177 an adequate method for the use or recycling of such wood 178 material at an existing or proposed solid waste management 179 facility that is permitted or authorized by the department on 180 June 1, 2007. The county is not required to hold a hearing if 181 the county represents that it previously has held a hearing for 182 such purpose, or if the county represents that it previously has 183 held a public meeting or hearing that authorized such method for 184 the use or recycling of trash or other nonputrescible waste 185 materials and that such materials include those materials 186 described in s. 403.703(7)(b) s. 403.703(6)(b). The county shall 187 provide written notice of its determination to the department by 188 no later than April 30, 2008; thereafter, the materials 189 described in s. 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) shall be excluded from 190 the definition of âconstruction and demolition debrisâ in s. 191 403.703(7) s. 403.703(6) within the jurisdiction of such county. 192 The county may withdraw or revoke its determination at any time 193 by providing written notice to the department. 194 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.